Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5720
Employee, defined.

Employee means a person who is employed by an employer in consideration for direct or indirect monetary wages, profit, or other remuneration.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 5.